viceverser/data/fr_ud.aff
FLAG long
SFX iP Y 49
SFX iP ourir ourir/ mourir  is:infi
SFX iP ourir ourant/ mourir  is:ppre
SFX iP ourir ort/ mourir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX iP ourir orts/ mourir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX iP ourir orte/ mourir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX iP ourir ort·e/ mourir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX iP ourir ortes/ mourir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX iP ourir ort·es/ mourir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX iP ourir eurs/ mourir  is:ipre is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iP ourir eurt/ mourir  is:ipre is:3sg
SFX iP ourir ourons/ mourir  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX iP ourir ourez/ mourir  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX iP ourir eurent/ mourir  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX iP ourir ourais/ mourir  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iP ourir ourait/ mourir  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX iP ourir ourions/ mourir  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX iP ourir ouriez/ mourir  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX iP ourir ouraient/ mourir  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX iP ourir ourus/ mourir  is:ipsi is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iP ourir ourut/ mourir  is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX iP ourir ourûmes/ mourir  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX iP ourir ourûtes/ mourir  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX iP ourir oururent/ mourir  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX iP ourir ourrai/ mourir  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX iP ourir ourras/ mourir  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX iP ourir ourra/ mourir  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX iP ourir ourrons/ mourir  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX iP ourir ourrez/ mourir  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX iP ourir ourront/ mourir  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX iP ourir ourrais/ mourir  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iP ourir ourrait/ mourir  is:cond is:3sg
SFX iP ourir ourrions/ mourir  is:cond is:1pl
SFX iP ourir ourriez/ mourir  is:cond is:2pl
SFX iP ourir ourraient/ mourir  is:cond is:3pl
SFX iP ourir eure/ mourir  is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX iP ourir eures/ mourir  is:spre is:2sg
SFX iP ourir ourusse/ mourir  is:simp is:1sg
SFX iP ourir ourusses/ mourir  is:simp is:2sg
SFX iP ourir ourût/ mourir  is:simp is:3sg
SFX iP ourir ourussions/ mourir  is:simp is:1pl
SFX iP ourir ourussiez/ mourir  is:simp is:2pl
SFX iP ourir ourussent/ mourir  is:simp is:3pl
SFX iP ourir eurs/ mourir  is:impe is:2sg
SFX iP ourir ourons/ mourir  is:impe is:1pl
SFX iP ourir ourez/ mourir  is:impe is:2pl
SFX iP ourir ort-e/ mourir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX iP ourir ort-es/ mourir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX iP ourir ort·e·s/ mourir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX iP ourir ort-e-s/ mourir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl

SFX iQ Y 49
SFX iQ ouillir ouillir/ bouillir  is:infi
SFX iQ ouillir ouillant/ bouillir  is:ppre
SFX iQ ouillir ouilli/ bouillir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillis/ bouillir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillie/ bouillir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouilli·e/ bouillir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillies/ bouillir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouilli·es/ bouillir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX iQ ouillir ous/ bouillir  is:ipre is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iQ ouillir out/ bouillir  is:ipre is:3sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillons/ bouillir  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillez/ bouillir  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillent/ bouillir  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillais/ bouillir  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillait/ bouillir  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillions/ bouillir  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouilliez/ bouillir  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillaient/ bouillir  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillis/ bouillir  is:ipsi is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillit/ bouillir  is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillîmes/ bouillir  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillîtes/ bouillir  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirent/ bouillir  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirai/ bouillir  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouilliras/ bouillir  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillira/ bouillir  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirons/ bouillir  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirez/ bouillir  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouilliront/ bouillir  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirais/ bouillir  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirait/ bouillir  is:cond is:3sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirions/ bouillir  is:cond is:1pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouilliriez/ bouillir  is:cond is:2pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouilliraient/ bouillir  is:cond is:3pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouille/ bouillir  is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouilles/ bouillir  is:spre is:2sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillisse/ bouillir  is:simp is:1sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillisses/ bouillir  is:simp is:2sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillît/ bouillir  is:simp is:3sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillissions/ bouillir  is:simp is:1pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillissiez/ bouillir  is:simp is:2pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillissent/ bouillir  is:simp is:3pl
SFX iQ ouillir ous/ bouillir  is:impe is:2sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouillons/ bouillir  is:impe is:1pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouillez/ bouillir  is:impe is:2pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouilli-e/ bouillir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX iQ ouillir ouilli-es/ bouillir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouilli·e·s/ bouillir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX iQ ouillir ouilli-e-s/ bouillir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl

SFX iR Y 47
SFX iR ueillir ueillir/ cueillir  is:infi
SFX iR ueillir ueillant/ cueillir  is:ppre
SFX iR ueillir ueilli/ cueillir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillis/ cueillir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillie/ cueillir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX iR ueillir ueilli·e/ cueillir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillies/ cueillir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX iR ueillir ueilli·es/ cueillir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX iR ueillir ueille/ cueillir  is:ipre is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX iR ueillir ueilles/ cueillir  is:ipre is:spre is:2sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillons/ cueillir  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillez/ cueillir  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillent/ cueillir  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillais/ cueillir  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillait/ cueillir  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillions/ cueillir  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX iR ueillir ueilliez/ cueillir  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillaient/ cueillir  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillis/ cueillir  is:ipsi is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillit/ cueillir  is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillîmes/ cueillir  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillîtes/ cueillir  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillirent/ cueillir  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX iR ueillir ueillerai/ cueillir  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX iR ueillir ueilleras/ cueillir  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillera/ cueillir  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillerons/ cueillir  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillerez/ cueillir  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX iR ueillir ueilleront/ cueillir  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX iR ueillir ueillerais/ cueillir  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillerait/ cueillir  is:cond is:3sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillerions/ cueillir  is:cond is:1pl
SFX iR ueillir ueilleriez/ cueillir  is:cond is:2pl
SFX iR ueillir ueilleraient/ cueillir  is:cond is:3pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillisse/ cueillir  is:simp is:1sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillisses/ cueillir  is:simp is:2sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillît/ cueillir  is:simp is:3sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillissions/ cueillir  is:simp is:1pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillissiez/ cueillir  is:simp is:2pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillissent/ cueillir  is:simp is:3pl
SFX iR ueillir ueille/ cueillir  is:impe is:2sg
SFX iR ueillir ueillons/ cueillir  is:impe is:1pl
SFX iR ueillir ueillez/ cueillir  is:impe is:2pl
SFX iR ueillir ueilli-e/ cueillir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX iR ueillir ueilli-es/ cueillir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX iR ueillir ueilli·e·s/ cueillir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX iR ueillir ueilli-e-s/ cueillir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
